Illinois, session 104th, SB689.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 22-601 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/22-601)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 22-601)7    Sec. 22-601. Preservation of pension rights. The The 8provisions of "An Act authorizing municipal corporations to 9preserve civil service and pension rights of their employees 10inducted into or enlisting in the land or naval forces of the 11United States, or ordered to active duty in the military or 12naval forces of the State", approved March 26, 1941, and all 13subsequent amendments and modifications thereof, to the extent 14applicable, shall apply to preserve pension rights of 15employees subject to this Code.16(Source: Laws 1963, p. 2034.)